Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-415
Department of Correctional Services; violence; suppression.

When any committed offender offers violence to any officer or employee of the Department of Correctional Services or to any other person or committed offender, or attempts to do any injury to the buildings, or to any workshop or to any appurtenances thereof, or disobeys or resists any reasonable command of an officer or employee, such officers and employees shall use all reasonable means to prevent such violence or injury and to enforce the observance of discipline. No officer or employee shall be liable, either civilly or criminally, for any damage to property or injury to any person, including death resulting therefrom, caused by him or his order, while performing any duty under this section, unless such act or order was manifestly beyond the scope of the authority of such officer or employee.

Laws 1897, c. 75, § 23, p. 339;

R.S.1913, § 7327;

C.S.1922, § 6987;

C.S.1929, § 83-924;

R.S.1943, § 83-415;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 76, p. 3109.